dev/mt_brokenplurals/appendix1.dix
    <pardef n="ċer/ċur__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>ċur</l><r>ċur<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ċrie</l><r>ċur<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="s/uq__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>uq</l><r>uq<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>wieq</l><r>uq<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="s/aqaf__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>aqaf</l><r>aqaf<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>oqfa</l><r>aqaf<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="far/sa__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>sa</l><r>sa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>es</l><r>sa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pex/pux__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>pux</l><r>pux<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>pxie</l><r>pux<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="r/aġel__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>aġel</l><r>aġel<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ġiel</l><r>aġel<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ċ/appella__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>appella</l><r>appella<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>papel</l><r>appella<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>piepel</l><r>appella<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="q/orq__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>orq</l><r>orq<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>rieq</l><r>orq<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="m/us__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>us</l><r>us<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>wies</l><r>us<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="n/iżla__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>iżla</l><r>iżla<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>żul</l><r>iżla<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="għar/bi__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>bi</l><r>bi<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ab</l><r>bi<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="/iżraq__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>iżraq</l><r>iżraq<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>żoroq</l><r>iżraq<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pes/pus__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>pus</l><r>pus<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>psie</l><r>pus<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ħ/anut__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>anut</l><r>anut<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>wienet</l><r>anut<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="q/antar__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>antar</l><r>antar<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>natar</l><r>antar<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="q/anfud__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>anfud</l><r>anfud<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>niefed</l><r>anfud<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="x/riek__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>riek</l><r>riek<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>orok</l><r>riek<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="l/upu__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>upu</l><r>upu<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>pup</l><r>upu<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ċ/angun__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>angun</l><r>angun<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>nagan</l><r>angun<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>nagen</l><r>angun<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="b/urdell__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>urdell</l><r>urdell<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>riedel</l><r>urdell<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="b/eċċun__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>eċċun</l><r>eċċun<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ċieċen</l><r>eċċun<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="m/oqdief__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>oqdief</l><r>oqdief<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>qadef</l><r>oqdief<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="b/ażbuż__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>ażbuż</l><r>ażbuż<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>żabaż</l><r>ażbuż<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>żiebeż</l><r>ażbuż<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ingrava/ta__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>ta</l><r>ta<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>jjet</l><r>ta<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="b/odbod__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>odbod</l><r>odbod<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>dabad</l><r>odbod<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="tik/ka__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>ka</l><r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ek</l><r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="g/allun__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>allun</l><r>allun<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>lalen</l><r>allun<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ban/k__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>k</l><r>k<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ek</l><r>k<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="b/armil__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>armil</l><r>armil<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ramel</l><r>armil<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="lab/ra__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>ra</l><r>ra<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ar</l><r>ra<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="lsi/r__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>r</l><r>r<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>era</l><r>r<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="/abjad__adj_GD">
      <e><p><l>abjad</l><r>abjad<s n="adj"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>bojod</l><r>abjad<s n="adj"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="xma/ra__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>ra</l><r>ra<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>jjar</l><r>ra<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ġ/emel__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>emel</l><r>emel<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>mula</l><r>emel<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>imla</l><r>emel<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="/ismar__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>ismar</l><r>ismar<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>somor</l><r>ismar<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="fr/oġa__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>oġa</l><r>oġa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ejjeġ</l><r>oġa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ċ/enpula__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>enpula</l><r>enpula<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>niepel</l><r>enpula<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="f/urketta__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>urketta</l><r>urketta<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>rieket</l><r>urketta<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="m/aqdes__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>aqdes</l><r>aqdes<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>qades</l><r>aqdes<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="għarbi"><i>għar</i><par n="għar/bi__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="raġel"><i>r</i><par n="r/aġel__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="bażbuż"><i>b</i><par n="b/ażbuż__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="takka"><i>tak</i><par n="tik/ka__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="siġra"><i>siġ</i><par n="lab/ra__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="suq"><i>s</i><par n="s/uq__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="qantar"><i>q</i><par n="q/antar__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="tikka"><i>tik</i><par n="tik/ka__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="lsir"><i>lsi</i><par n="lsi/r__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="bodbod"><i>b</i><par n="b/odbod__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="klikka"><i>klik</i><par n="tik/ka__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="beċċun"><i>b</i><par n="b/eċċun__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="qorq"><i>q</i><par n="q/orq__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="banka"><i>ban</i><par n="tik/ka__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="bxara"><i>bxa</i><par n="xma/ra__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="furketta"><i>f</i><par n="f/urketta__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="plakka"><i>plak</i><par n="tik/ka__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="għassa"><i>għas</i><par n="far/sa__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="bank"><i>ban</i><par n="ban/k__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="pexpux"><i>pex</i><par n="pex/pux__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="żjara"><i>żja</i><par n="xma/ra__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="nassa"><i>nas</i><par n="far/sa__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ingassa"><i>ingas</i><par n="far/sa__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="rassa"><i>ras</i><par n="far/sa__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="froġa"><i>fr</i><par n="fr/oġa__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ħanut"><i>ħ</i><par n="ħ/anut__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ġamra"><i>ġam</i><par n="lab/ra__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="xmara"><i>xma</i><par n="xma/ra__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="burdell"><i>b</i><par n="b/urdell__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="massa"><i>mas</i><par n="far/sa__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="inċirata"><i>inċira</i><par n="ingrava/ta__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="xriek"><i>x</i><par n="x/riek__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ballun"><i>b</i><par n="g/allun__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ismar"><i></i><par n="/ismar__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="mus"><i>m</i><par n="m/us__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="lupu"><i>l</i><par n="l/upu__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="manka"><i>man</i><par n="tik/ka__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="saqaf"><i>s</i><par n="s/aqaf__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ingravata"><i>ingrava</i><par n="ingrava/ta__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="barmil"><i>b</i><par n="b/armil__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="maqdes"><i>m</i><par n="m/aqdes__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ċerċur"><i>ċer</i><par n="ċer/ċur__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ċenpula"><i>ċ</i><par n="ċ/enpula__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="moqdief"><i>m</i><par n="m/oqdief__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="qanfud"><i>q</i><par n="q/anfud__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="niżla"><i>n</i><par n="n/iżla__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="farsa"><i>far</i><par n="far/sa__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="pespus"><i>pes</i><par n="pes/pus__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ċangun"><i>ċ</i><par n="ċ/angun__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="abjad"><i></i><par n="/abjad__adj_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="iżraq"><i></i><par n="/iżraq__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="trinka"><i>trin</i><par n="tik/ka__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ġemel"><i>ġ</i><par n="ġ/emel__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ċappella"><i>ċ</i><par n="ċ/appella__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="baqra"><i>baq</i><par n="lab/ra__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="sikka"><i>sik</i><par n="tik/ka__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="gallun"><i>g</i><par n="g/allun__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="għamara"><i>għama</i><par n="xma/ra__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="stikka"><i>stik</i><par n="tik/ka__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ġarra"><i>ġar</i><par n="lab/ra__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="labra"><i>lab</i><par n="lab/ra__n_GD"/></e>
